Utah statutes.
77-7-15.   Authority of peace officer to stop and question suspect -- Grounds.

A peace officer may stop any person in a public place when he has a reasonable suspicion to believe he has committed or is in the act of committing or is attempting to commit a public offense and may demand his name, address and an explanation of his actions.

